District of Columbia statutes.
2-1211.04

Duties of commission.

The commission shall develop a method for the evaluation of a strategy to establish and implement an enterprise zone or zones in the District. The process shall include: The evaluation and consideration of a method to best select proposed sites for an enterprise zone or zones; tax incentives based on the number of new employees; exemptions from sales taxes on materials used in construction; abatement in real estate taxes; tax credits or deductions for capital improvements or employee training; low interest loans to help businesses get started; and reduction of business taxes to a level equal to or below that of the surrounding jurisdictions.

Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-171, § 5, 33 DCR 7205
1981 Ed., § 1-2254.